Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
ARTICLE 35
HOME RULE COUNTIES

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 GENERAL POWERS

PART 3 ORDINANCES - PENALTIES

PART 4 ORDINANCE CODES ADOPTED
BY REFERENCE

PART 5 ACTIONS BY OR AGAINST
HOME RULE COUNTIES

PART 6 BONDS - FUNDING
- FLOATING DEBT

PART 7 BONDS - REFUNDING
BONDED DEBT

PART 8 BONDS - TO PAY MATURED
SPECIAL ASSESSMENT

PART 9 SPECIAL TAXING DISTRICTS